Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.390

Determination and publication of commercial values—Use in assessment of penalty payments.

For the purpose of determining the commercial value to be applied under the provisions of RCW 15.54.380, the department shall determine and publish the values per unit of nitrogen, available phosphoric acid, and soluble potash in commercial fertilizers in this state. The values so determined and published shall be used in determining and assessing penalty payments and shall be established by rule.

[ 1987 c 45 s 18; 1967 ex.s. c 22 s 27.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1987 c 45: See notes following RCW 15.54.270.